Illinois, session 104th, HB1919.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The River Edge Redevelopment Zone Act is 5amended by changing Section 10-5.3 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 115/10-5.3)7    Sec. 10-5.3. Certification of River Edge Redevelopment 8Zones. 9    (a) Approval of designated River Edge Redevelopment Zones 10shall be made by the Department by certification of the 11designating ordinance. The Department shall promptly issue a 12certificate for each zone upon its approval. The certificate 13shall be signed by the Director of the Department, shall make 14specific reference to the designating ordinance, which shall 15be attached thereto, and shall be filed in the office of the 16Secretary of State. A certified copy of the River Edge 17Redevelopment Zone Certificate, or a duplicate original 18thereof, shall be recorded in the office of the recorder of 19deeds of the county in which the River Edge Redevelopment Zone 20lies.21    (b) A River Edge Redevelopment Zone shall be effective 22upon its certification. The Department shall transmit a copy 23of the certification to the Department of Revenue, and to the   HB1919- 2 -LRB104 10300 RTM 20374 b1designating municipality. Upon certification of a River Edge 2Redevelopment Zone, the terms and provisions of the 3designating ordinance shall be in effect, and may not be 4amended or repealed except in accordance with Section 10-5.4.5    (c) A River Edge Redevelopment Zone shall be in effect for 6the period stated in the certificate, which shall in no event 7exceed 30 calendar years. Zones shall terminate at midnight of 8December 31 of the final calendar year of the certified term, 9except as provided in Section 10-5.4.10    (d) In calendar years 2006 and 2007, the Department may 11certify one pilot River Edge Redevelopment Zone in the City of 12East St. Louis, one pilot River Edge Redevelopment Zone in the 13City of Rockford, and one pilot River Edge Redevelopment Zone 14in the City of Aurora.15    In calendar year 2009, the Department may certify one 16pilot River Edge Redevelopment Zone in the City of Elgin. 17    On or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 18the 97th General Assembly, the Department may certify one 19additional pilot River Edge Redevelopment Zone in the City of 20Peoria. 21    On or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 22the 103rd General Assembly, the Department may certify 2 23additional pilot River Edge Redevelopment Zones, including one 24in the City of Joliet and one in the City of Kankakee. 25    On or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 26the 103rd General Assembly, the Department may certify 7   HB1919- 3 -LRB104 10300 RTM 20374 b1additional pilot River Edge Redevelopment Zones, including one 2in the City of East Moline, one in the City of Moline, one in 3the City of Ottawa, one in the City of LaSalle, one in the City 4of Peru, one in the City of Rock Island, and one in the City of 5Quincy. 6    On or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 7the 104th General Assembly, the Department may certify one 8additional pilot River Edge Redevelopment Zone in the City of 9Sterling. 10    After certifying the additional pilot River Edge 11Redevelopment Zones authorized by the above paragraphs, the 12Department may not certify any additional River Edge 13Redevelopment Zones, but it may amend and rescind 14certifications of existing River Edge Redevelopment Zones in 15accordance with Section 10-5.4, except that no River Edge 16Redevelopment Zone may be extended on or after the effective 17date of this amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly. Each 18River Edge Redevelopment Zone in existence on the effective 19date of this amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly shall 20continue until its scheduled termination under this Act, 21unless the Zone is decertified sooner. At the time of its term 22expiration each River Edge Redevelopment Zone will become an 23open enterprise zone, available for the previously designated 24area or a different area to compete for designation as an 25enterprise zone. No preference for designation as a Zone will 26be given to the previously designated area.  HB1919- 4 -LRB104 10300 RTM 20374 b1    (e) A municipality in which a River Edge Redevelopment 2Zone has been certified must submit to the Department, within 360 days after the certification, a plan for encouraging the 4participation by minority persons, women, persons with 5disabilities, and veterans in the zone. The Department may 6assist the municipality in developing and implementing the 7plan. The terms "minority person", "woman", and "person with a 8disability" have the meanings set forth under Section 2 of the 9Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 10Disabilities Act. "Veteran" means an Illinois resident who is 11a veteran as defined in subsection (h) of Section 1491 of Title 1210 of the United States Code.13(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-595, eff. 6-26-24.)